Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-756
Extradition; other criminal prosecutions; no right of asylum or immunity.

After a person has been brought back to this state by, or after waiver of extradition proceedings, he may be tried in this state for other crimes which he may be charged with having committed here as well as that specified in the requisition for his extradition.

Laws 1963, c. 159, § 28, p. 568.

The foregoing statute has long been the rule in this state. State v. Dodd, 175 Neb. 533, 122 N.W.2d 518 (1963).